Hawaii statutes.
§134-3 Registration, mandatory, exceptions.
(a) Every person arriving in the State who brings or by any other manner
causes to be brought into the State a firearm of any description, whether
usable or unusable, serviceable or unserviceable, modern or antique, shall
register the firearm within five days after arrival of the person or of the
firearm, whichever arrives later, with the chief of police of the county of the
person's place of business or, if there is no place of business, the person's
residence or, if there is neither a place of business nor residence, the
person's place of sojourn. A nonresident alien may bring firearms not
otherwise prohibited by law into the State for a continuous period not to
exceed ninety days; provided that the person meets the registration requirement
of this section and the person possesses:

(1) A valid Hawaii hunting license procured under
chapter 183D, part II, or a commercial or private shooting preserve permit
issued pursuant to section 183D-34;

(2) A written document indicating the person has been
invited to the State to shoot on private land; or

(3) Written notification from a firing range or
target shooting business indicating that the person will actually engage in
target shooting.

The nonresident alien shall be limited to a
nontransferable registration of not more than ten firearms for the purpose of
the above activities.

Every person registering a firearm under this
subsection shall be fingerprinted and photographed by the police department of
the county of registration; provided that this requirement shall be waived
where fingerprints and photographs are already on file with the police
department. The police department shall perform an inquiry on the person by
using the International Justice and Public Safety Network, including the United
States Immigration and Customs Enforcement query, the National Crime
Information Center, and the National Instant Criminal Background Check System,
pursuant to section 846-2.7 before any determination to register a firearm is
made.

(b) Every person who acquires a firearm
pursuant to section 134-2 shall register the firearm in the manner prescribed
by this section within five days of acquisition. The registration shall be on
forms prescribed by the attorney general, which shall be uniform throughout the
State, and shall include the following information: name of the manufacturer
and importer; model; type of action; caliber or gauge; serial number; and
source from which receipt was obtained, including the name and address of the
prior registrant. If the firearm has no serial number, the permit number shall
be entered in the space provided for the serial number, and the permit number
shall be engraved upon the receiver portion of the firearm prior to
registration. All registration data that would identify the individual
registering the firearm by name or address shall be confidential and shall not
be disclosed to anyone, except as may be required:

(1) For processing the registration;

(2) For database management by the Hawaii criminal
justice data center;

(3) By a law enforcement agency for the lawful
performance of its duties; or

(4) By order of a court.

(c) Dealers licensed under section 134-31 or
dealers licensed by the United States Department of Justice shall register
firearms pursuant to this section on registration forms prescribed by the
attorney general and shall not be required to have the firearms physically
inspected by the chief of police at the time of registration.

(d) Registration shall not be required for:

(1) Any device that is designed to fire loose black
powder or that is a firearm manufactured before 1899;

(2) Any device not designed to fire or made incapable
of being readily restored to a firing condition; or

(3) All unserviceable firearms and destructive
devices registered with the Bureau of Alcohol, Tobacco, and Firearms of the
United States Department of Justice pursuant to Title 27, Code of Federal
Regulations.

(e) No fee shall be charged for the
registration of a firearm under this section, except for a fee chargeable by
and payable to the registering county for persons registering a firearm under
subsection (a), in an amount equal to the fee charged by the Hawaii criminal
justice data center pursuant to section 846-2.7. In the case of a joint
registration, the fee provided for in this section may be charged to each
person. [L 1988, c 275, pt of §2; am L 1994, c 204, §4; am L 1999, c 217, §2;
am L 2007, c 9, §7; am L 2013, c 254, §2; am L 2016, c 108, §3]

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next